Arkansas, session 2025, SB598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 11-1-204 is amended to read as follows:
11-1-204. Determination of employment status.
For purposes of this title, an employer or agency charged with
determining the employment status of an individual shall use the twenty-
factor test factors enumerated by the Internal Revenue Service in Rev. Rul.
87-41, 1987-1 C.B. 296 26 C.F.R. § 31.3121(d)-1, as it existed on January 1,
*CRH265*
04/01/2025 11:18:27 AM CRH265

SB598
2025, in making its determination and shall consider whether:
(1) A person for whom a service is performed has the right to
require compliance with instructions, including without limitation when,
where, and how a worker is to work;
(2) A worker is required to receive training, including without
limitation through:
(A) Working with an experienced employee;
(B) Corresponding with the person for whom a service is
performed;
(C) Attending meetings; or
(D) Other training methods;
(3) A worker's services are integrated into the business
operation of the person for whom a service is performed and are provided in a
way that shows the worker's services are subject to the direction and control
of the person for whom a service is performed;
(4) A worker's services are required to be performed personally,
indicating an interest in the methods used and the results;
(5) A person for whom a service is performed hires, supervises,
or pays assistants;
(6) A continuing relationship exists between a worker performing
services and a person for whom a service is performed;
(7) A worker performing a service has hours set by the person
for whom a service is performed;
(8) A worker is required to devote substantially full time to
the business of the person for whom a service is performed, indicating the
person for whom a service is performed has control over the amount of time
the worker spends working and by implication restricts the worker from
obtaining other gainful work;
(9)(A) The work is performed on the premises of the person for
whom a service is performed, or the person for whom a service is performed
has control over where the work takes place.
(B) A person for whom a service is performed has control
over where the work takes place if the person has the right to:
(i) Compel the worker to travel a designated route;
(ii) Compel the worker to canvass a territory within
a certain time; or
04/01/2025 11:18:27 AM CRH265

SB598
(iii) Require that the work be done at a specific
place, especially if the work could be performed elsewhere;
(10) A worker is required to perform services in the order or
sequence set by the person for whom a service is performed or the person for
whom a service is performed retains the right to set the order or sequence;
(11) A worker is required to submit regular oral or written
reports to the person for whom a service is performed;
(12) A worker is paid by the hour, week, or month except when he
or she is paid by the hour, week, or month only as a convenient way of paying
a lump sum agreed upon as the cost of a job;
(13) A person for whom a service is performed pays the worker's
business or traveling expenses;
(14) A person for whom a service is performed provides
significant tools and materials to the worker performing services;
(15) A worker invests in the facilities used in performing the
services;
(16) A worker realizes a profit or suffers a loss as a result of
the services performed that is in addition to the profit or loss ordinarily
realized by an employee;
(17) A worker performs more than de minimis services for more
than one (1) person or firm at the same time, unless the persons or firms are
part of the same service arrangement;
(18) A worker makes his or her services available to the general
public on a regular and consistent basis;
(19) A person for whom a service is performed retains the right
to discharge the worker; and
(20) A worker has the right to terminate the relationship with
the person for whom a service is performed at any time he or she wishes
without incurring liability.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 11-4-103 is amended to read as follows:
11-4-103. Employment status.
For purposes of this chapter, employment status as an employee or
independent contractor is determined by consideration of the twenty-factor
test factors required by the Empower Independent Contractors Act of 2019, §
11-1-201 et seq.
04/01/2025 11:18:27 AM CRH265

SB598

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 11-4-607(1)(A), concerning the definition
of "employee" under the wage discrimination law, is amended to read as
follows:
(1)(A) “Employee” means an individual who performs services for
an employer for wages in a lawful business, industry, trade, profession, or
enterprise, and the individual's employment status has been determined by
consideration of the twenty-factor test factors required by the Empower
Independent Contractors Act of 2019, § 11-1-201 et seq.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 11-9-102(9)(A), concerning the definition
of "employee" under the Workers' Compensation Law resulting from Initiated
Act 4 of 1948, is amended to read as follows:
(9)(A) “Employee” means an individual, including a minor,
whether lawfully or unlawfully employed in the service of an employer under a
contract of hire or apprenticeship, written or oral, expressed or implied,
and the individual's employment status has been determined by consideration
of the twenty-factor test factors required by the Empower Independent
Contractors Act of 2019, § 11-1-201 et seq.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 11-9-103(d), concerning the applicability
of the chapter in the determination of employment status under the Workers'
Compensation Law resulting from Initiated Act 4 of 1948, is amended to read
as follows:
(d) For purposes of this chapter, employment status as an employee or
independent contractor is determined by consideration of the twenty-factor
test factors required by the Empower Independent Contractors Act of 2019, §
11-1-201 et seq.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 11-10-210(e), concerning the definition of
"employment" related services performed by an individual for an employer for
wages, under the Division of Workforce Services Law, is amended to read as
follows:
(e) Service performed by an individual for an employer for wages in a
lawful business, industry, trade, profession, or enterprise, and the
individual's employment status has been determined by consideration of the
04/01/2025 11:18:27 AM CRH265

SB598
twenty-factor test factors required by the Empower Independent Contractors
Act of 2019, § 11-1-201 et seq., is deemed to be employment under this
chapter.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 11-10-301(a), concerning the creation of
the Division of Workforce Services, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) There is created a division to be known as the “Division of
Workforce Services”.
(2) The division shall be administered by a full-time salaried
director.
(3) The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall be
appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor.
(4) The director Director of the Division of Workforce Services
shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Commerce.
(5) The director shall have resided in the state for at least
five (5) years and shall be a qualified elector.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 11-10-507(a)(3)(E), concerning the amount
of time considered as a short-term layoff related to being able and available
to work under the Division of Workforce Services Law related to eligibility
for unemployment compensation benefits, is amended to read as follows:
(E) An individual on short-term layoff who expects to be
recalled by his or her employer to a full-time job and whose employer intends
to recall the individual to a full-time job within ten (10) three (3) weeks
after the initial date of his or her layoff shall not be required during the
layoff to register for work at a division office or to seek other work.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 11-10-507(b), concerning the work search
contacts required under the Division of Workforce Services Law, is amended to
add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(4) The director may establish by rule the criteria for the
reduction or removal of the work search requirement under this section.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 11-10-519(a)(1)(A), concerning the
disqualification of benefits for false statements, is amended to read as
follows:
04/01/2025 11:18:27 AM CRH265

SB598
(1)(A) If he or she willfully makes a false statement or
misrepresentation of a material fact or willfully fails to disclose a
material fact in filing an initial claim or a claim renewal, he or she shall
be disqualified from the effective date of the disqualification until he or
she has twenty (20) weeks of employment as defined under § 11-10-210 in each
of which the weeks he or she has earned wages equal to at least his or her
weekly benefit amount.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 11-10-521(b)(1)(A), concerning a notice of
the filing of an initial claim under the Division of Workforce Services Law
to the last employer, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) A notice of the filing of an initial claim shall be
immediately mailed or posted online under subsection (c) of this section, or
both, to the employing unit known to the claimant as his or her last employer
as defined under § 11-10-209.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 11-10-532, concerning recovery of amounts
paid under the Division of Workforce Services Law, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(h) The director may promulgate rules to establish criteria for the
eligibility of claimants for a waiver of penalties and interest for the
settlement of overpayments under this section.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 11-10-720(a)(2)(A), concerning the
certification of assessment after ten (10) days related to delinquent
contributions, interest, or penalties under the Division of Workforce
Services Law, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) At the end of ten (10) days thereafter, the assessment
shall become prima facie correct, and the director shall certify the amount
of the delinquent contributions, interest, and penalties to the clerk of the
circuit court of the county wherein the employer is domiciled or has a place
of business, and it shall be the duty of the clerk to file the certificate of
record and to enter it in the record of the circuit court for judgment and
decree under the procedure prescribed for filing transcripts of judgments by
§ 16-19-1011 [repealed].

04/01/2025 11:18:27 AM CRH265

SB598
SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 15-4-3705 is amended to read as follows:
15-4-3705. Arkansas Workforce Development Board committees.
(a)(1) To comply with the requirements and responsibilities assigned
under this subchapter, the Arkansas Workforce Development Board shall select
from its membership an executive committee to be composed of at least nine
(9) members but no more than eleven (11) members.
(2) The Chair of the Arkansas Workforce Development Board and
the Vice Chair of the Arkansas Workforce Development Board shall serve as
chair and vice chair of the executive committee, respectively.
(3) The membership of the executive committee shall include:
(A) At least five (5) members representing businesses;
(B) At least one (1) chief elected official; and
(C) At least two (2) representatives from among members
appointed under § 15-4-3704(b)(2)(B).
(b)(1) The board shall have a standing committee to provide oversight
of the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program and ensure that all
program participants are receiving the assistance, the information, and the
services needed to help these low-income parents prepare for and connect with
employment that will lead to a self-sufficient wage.
(2) The membership of the standing committee shall include:
(A) At least five (5) members representing businesses;
(B) At least one (1) chief elected official;
(C) At least one (1) member from among those members
appointed under § 15-4-3704(b)(2)(B);
(D) The Director of the Division of Workforce Services;
and
(E) The Director of the Division of County Operations, as
a standing committee voting member who is also not a member of the board.
(c)(b) The board may form other committees as needed.
(d)(c) Membership on any committee shall not extend beyond the
member's term of service on the board.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 19-5-984(b)(2), concerning the use of the
Division of Workforce Services Special Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The fund shall be used for refunds of interest and penalties
erroneously paid and other additional purposes as determined by the Director
04/01/2025 11:18:27 AM CRH265

SB598
of the Division of Workforce Services under §§ 11-10-532 and 11-10-716 — 11-
10-723 to be necessary to the proper administration of the following:
(A) The Division of Workforce Services Law, § 11-10-101 et
seq.;
(B) The Arkansas Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act,
§ 15-4-3701 et seq., or its successor;
(C) The Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program, §
20-76-101 et seq., or its successor;
(D) The Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of
2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq., or its successor; and
(E)(C) Any other programs transferred under the direction
and supervision of the Division of Workforce Services, by either executive
order or legislative enactment, or their successor programs.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1131(b), concerning the use of the
Division of Workforce Services Training Trust Fund, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) The fund shall consist of the proceeds of the administrative
assessment specified in § 11-10-706(c)(3), any interest accruing on these
revenues, and any other funds made available by the General Assembly.
(2) The fund shall be used for personnel services, operating
expenses, and grants for the administration of worker training programs under
rules promulgated by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 20-76-106(a)(2), concerning the statewide
implementation plan related to transitional employment assistance, is amended
to read as follows:
(2)(A) Ensure that program recipients throughout the state,
including those in rural areas, have comparable access to transitional
employment assistance benefits.
(B) The statewide implementation plan shall be subject to
the review and recommendation of the Arkansas Workforce Development Board.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 20-76-704(a)(2), concerning the powers and
duties of the Department of Human Services under the Drug Screening and
Testing Act of 2015, is amended to read as follows:
04/01/2025 11:18:27 AM CRH265

SB598
(2) Develop appropriate screening techniques and processes to
establish reasonable cause that an applicant or recipient is using a drug and
to establish the necessary criteria to permit the Division of Workforce
Services, in coordination with the department, to require the applicant or
recipient to undergo no less than a five-panel drug test;

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 21-6-402(c), concerning fees to be charged
by the circuit court clerks, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The fees to be charged by the circuit court clerks of this state
to the Department of Finance and Administration and the Division of Workforce
Services shall be as follows:
(1) For filing a certificate of indebtedness issued by the
Department of Finance and Administration or a certificate of overpayment or
certificate of assessment by the Division of Workforce Services ........ 8.00
(2) For filing a release of a certificate of indebtedness, a
certificate of overpayment, or a certificate of assessment ............. 6.00
(3) For an execution on a certificate of indebtedness filed by
the Department of Finance and Administration or a certificate of overpayment
or a certificate of assessment filed by the Division of Workforce Services
............. 10.00.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 23-115-1004(c), concerning the priority of
liens by a claimant agency on winnings under the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery
Act, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The liens created by this section are ranked by priority as
follows:
(1) Taxes due the state;
(2) Delinquent child support; and
(3) Overpayment of unemployment insurance benefits; and
(3)(4) All other judgments and liens in order of the date
entered or perfected.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 25-30-109(a)(1), concerning the creation
of the Office of Skills Development, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) There is created within the Department of Commerce the Office
of Skills Development within the Division of Workforce Services.
04/01/2025 11:18:27 AM CRH265